src/support/hyphen/ushyph2.tex
    % ushyph2.tex -- patterns for standard hyphenation pattern memory of 8000.
    % 
    % Copyright (C) 1990, 2004 Gerard D.C. Kuiken.
    % Copying and distribution of this file, with or without modification,
    % are permitted in any medium without royalty provided the copyright
    % notice and this notice are preserved.
    % 
    % Can be used with all standard TeX versions.
    % Hyphenation trie becomes 6661 with 229 ops.
    % 
    % These patterns are based on the Hyphenation Exception Log
    % published in TUGboat, Volume 10 (1989), No. 3, pp. 337-341,
    % and a large number of incorrectly hyphenated words not yet published.
    % If added to Liang's before the closing bracket } of \patterns,
    % the patterns run errorfree as far as known at this moment.
    % 
    % These patterns do not find all admissible hyphens of the words in
    % the Exception Log, but ushyphmax.tex does.
    % 
    % Please send bugs or suggestions to tex-live (at) tug.org.
    % 
    % Patterns of March 1, 1990.
.driv4
.eth1y6l1
.eu4ler
.ev2
.ga4som
.ge4ome
.he3p6a
.in5u2t
.kil2ni
.ko6rte
.le6ice
.me4gal
.met4ala
.mimi4cr
.mis4ers
.ne6o3f
.non1e2m
.semi5
.sem4ic
.semid6
.semip4
.semir4
.sem6is4
.semiv4
.sph6in1
.to6pog
.to2q
.vi4car
.we2b1l
.ree4c
a4cabl
af6fish
anal6ys
anoa4c
anti3de
anti3n2
anti3re
a4peable
ar4range
as5ymptot
at6tes.
augh4tl
av3iou
ba6r1onie
bbi4t
be4vie
bid4if
bil4lab
bio5m
bi3orb
bio3rh
blan4d
blin4d
blon4d
bo4tul
brus4q
bus6i2er
bus6i2es
buss4in
but4ed.
but4ted
cad5em
catas4
4chs.
chs3hu
ciga3r
cin4q
cle4ar
co6ph1o3n
cous4ti
cri5tie
cro5e4co
c2tro3me6c
cu4ranc
4d3alone
data3b
d2dib
de4als.
de2clin
de5fin5iti
de4mos
des3ic
de4tic
dic5aid
dif5fra
di4ren
di4rer
4dlead
4dli4e
do5word
drif4ta
d3tab
ea4nies
e3chas
edg3l
eli4tis
e3loa
en3dix
e6pineph
e4rian.
espac6i
ethy6lene
eu4clid1
feb3ru
fermi3o
3fich
flag6el
g6endre.
geo3d
ght3we
g3lead
4g1lish
g4nac
g4nor.
g4nores
4go4niza
griev3
ha4parr
hatch3
hex2a
hipela4
ho6r1ic.
h4teou
id4ios
ign4it
i4jk
im5peda
infras4
i5nitely.
irre6v3oc
i5tesima
ithi4l
janu3a
ke6ling
ki5netic
k3sha
la4cie
lai6ness
l3chai
l3chil6d
lea4sa
lecta6b
litho5g
ll1fl
l4lish
lo4ges.
l3tea
lthi4ly
lue1p
man3u1sc
mar3gin
medi4c
medi5cin
medio6c
me5gran
mi3dab
mil4lag
milli5li
mi6n3is.
min4ute
m3mab
5maphro
5mocrat
moe4las
mole5c
mon4ey1l
mono5ch
mo4no1en
moro6n5is
monos6
moth4et2
mou5sin
mshack4
mu4dro
mul4ti5u
nar4chs.
nch4est
ne5back
4neski
nd3thr
nfin5ites
4nian.
nge5nes
ng3ho
ng3spr
nk3rup
n5less
nom1a6l
nom5eno
no5mist
non5eq
noni4so
no5vemb
ns5ceiv
ns4moo
ntre3p
obli2g1
o3chas
oerst4
oke3st
olon4om
o3mecha6
o5norma
ono4ton
o3nou
op3ism.
or4tho3ni4t
orth5ri
o4spher
o6v3ian.
oxi6d2ic
pal6mat
parag6ra4
par4ale
param4
para5me
pee4v1
phi2l3an
phi5latel
pi4cad
pli4cab
pli5nar
1pole.
poly1e
prema5c
pre5neu
pres4pli
pro4cess
proc5ity.
pro4ge
3pseu4d
pseud6od2
pseud6of2
ptomat4
p5trol
pubes5c
quain4te
qu6a3si3
quasir6
quasis6
quiv4ar
r5abolic
ra3chu
r3a3dig
radi1o6g
r4amen
ra4me3triz
ra3mou
ran4has
ra3or
r3binge
re4cipr
rec4ogn
rec5t6ang
re2f1orma
re4tribu
r3ial.
riv3ol
rk3ho
6rks.
ro3bot3
roe4las
r3thou
r3treu
r3veil
rz3sc
sales5c
sales5w
sca6p1er
sca4tol
s4chitz
sci4utt
scy4th
se1mi6t1ic
sep5temb
shoe5st
side5st
side5sw
sky3sc
s4ogamy
so4lute
s4pace
s4pacin
spe5cio
spher5o
spi4cil
spokes5w
sports5c
sports5w
s5quito
s4sa3chu
ss3hat
s4sian.
s4tamp
s4tants
star5tli
sta3ti
st5b
stor5ab
strat5ag
strib5ut
st5scr
stupi4d
styl5is
su2per1e6
3sync
sythi4
swimm6
ta3gon.
talka5
ta3min
t6ap6ath
tar4rh
tch3c
tch5ed
tch5ier
t1cr
tele4g
tele1r6o
tess4es
tha4lam
tho5don
tho5geni
thok4er
thy4lan
thy3sc
4tian.
ti4nom
tli4er
tot3ic
trai5tor
tra5vers
treach5e
tr4ial.
5tro1leum
tro5fit
trop4is
tropo5les
tropo5lis
tropol5it
tsch5ie
ttribut5
turn5ar
t1wh
ty4pal
u2ral.
v3ativ
va6guer
v5ereig
voice5p
waste3w6
waveg4
w3c
week3n
wide5sp
wo4ken
wrap5aro
x1q
xquis3
y5ched
ym5etry
y3stro
z2z3w
